Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2068.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1.2 of the act of November 26, 1982 (P.L.744, No.203), referred to as the Prothonotary Fee Law, is amended to read:Section 1.2. Automation fee for prothonotary's office.(a) In addition to any other fee authorized by law, an automation fee of not more than [$5] $10 may be charged and collected by the prothonotary of counties of the second class A and the third through eighth class, including home rule counties of the same class, for the initiation of any action or legal proceeding. The automation fee shall be deposited into a special prothonotary automation fund established in each county. Moneys in the special fund shall be used solely for the purpose of 123456789101112131415161718192021 automation and continued automation update of the office of the prothonotary.(b) The amount of the automation fee under subsection (a) may be increased not more than once every three years, provided that the amount of the increase may not be greater than the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: All Items (CPI-U) for the United States City Average, as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the immediate three years preceding an increase in the fee or change under this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2068PN2651 - 2 - 1234567891011